Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-004.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1702, amend (1),
(2) introductory portion, (3)(a), (4)(a) introductory portion, (5) introductory
portion, and (7) as follows:
6-1-1702. Developer duty to avoid algorithmic discrimination -
required documentation. (1) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30,
2026, a developer of a high-risk artificial intelligence system shall use
reasonable care to protect consumers from any known or reasonably
foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended
and contracted uses of the high-risk artificial intelligence system. In any
enforcement action brought on or after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, by
the attorney general pursuant to section 6-1-1706, there is a rebuttable
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

presumption that a developer used reasonable care as required under this
section if the developer complied with this section and any additional
requirements or obligations as set forth in rules promulgated ADOPTED by
the attorney general pursuant to section 6-1-1707.
(2) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, and except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, a developer of a high-risk
artificial intelligence system shall make available to the deployer or other
developer of the high-risk artificial intelligence system:
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a
developer that offers, sells, leases, licenses, gives, or otherwise makes
available to a deployer or other developer a high-risk artificial intelligence
system on or after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, shall make available to
the deployer or other developer, to the extent feasible, the documentation
and information, through artifacts such as model cards, dataset cards, or
other impact assessments, necessary for a deployer, or for a third party
contracted by a deployer, to complete an impact assessment pursuant to
section 6-1-1703 (3).
(4) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, a developer
shall make available, in a manner that is clear and readily available on the
developer's website or in a public use case inventory, a statement
summarizing:
(5) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, a developer of a
high-risk artificial intelligence system shall disclose to the attorney general,
in a form and manner prescribed by the attorney general, and to all known
deployers or other developers of the high-risk artificial intelligence system,
any known or reasonably foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination
arising from the intended uses of the high-risk artificial intelligence system
without unreasonable delay but no later than ninety days after the date on
which:
(7) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, the attorney
general may require that a developer disclose to the attorney general, no
later than ninety days after the request and in a form and manner prescribed
by the attorney general, the statement or documentation described in
subsection (2) of this section. The attorney general may evaluate such
statement or documentation to ensure compliance with this part 17, and the
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 25B-004

statement or documentation is not subject to disclosure under the "Colorado
Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24. In a disclosure MADE
pursuant to this subsection (7), a developer may designate the statement or
documentation as including proprietary information or a trade secret. To the
extent that any information contained in the statement or documentation
includes information subject to attorney-client privilege or work-product
protection, the disclosure does not constitute a waiver of the privilege or
protection.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1703, amend (1),
(2)(a) introductory portion, (3)(a), (3)(c), (3)(g), (4)(a) introductory portion,
(4)(b) introductory portion, (5)(a) introductory portion, (7), and (9) as
follows:
6-1-1703. Deployer duty to avoid algorithmic discrimination -
risk management policy and program. (1) On and after February 1, 2026
JUNE 30, 2026, a deployer of a high-risk artificial intelligence system shall
use reasonable care to protect consumers from any known or reasonably
foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination. In any enforcement action
brought on or after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, by the attorney general
pursuant to section 6-1-1706, there is a rebuttable presumption that a
deployer of a high-risk artificial intelligence system used reasonable care
as required under this section if the deployer complied with this section and
any additional requirements or obligations as set forth in rules promulgated
ADOPTED by the attorney general pursuant to section 6-1-1707.
(2) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, and except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, a deployer of a high-risk artificial
intelligence system shall implement a risk management policy and program
to govern the deployer's deployment of the high-risk artificial intelligence
system. The risk management policy and program must specify and
incorporate the principles, processes, and personnel that the deployer uses
to identify, document, and mitigate known or reasonably foreseeable risks
of algorithmic discrimination. The risk management policy and program
must be an iterative process planned, implemented, and regularly and
systematically reviewed and updated over the life cycle of a high-risk
artificial intelligence system, requiring regular, systematic review and
updates. A risk management policy and program implemented and
maintained pursuant to this subsection (2) must be reasonable considering:
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 25B-004

(3) (a) Except as provided in subsections (3)(d), (3)(e), and (6) of
this section:
(I) A deployer, or a third party contracted by the deployer, that
deploys a high-risk artificial intelligence system on or after February 1,
2026 JUNE 30, 2026, shall complete an impact assessment for the high-risk
artificial intelligence system; and
(II) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, a deployer, or a
third party contracted by the deployer, shall complete an impact assessment
for a deployed high-risk artificial intelligence system at least annually and
within ninety days after any intentional and substantial modification to the
high-risk artificial intelligence system is made available.
(c) In addition to the information required under subsection (3)(b)
of this section, an impact assessment completed pursuant to this subsection
(3) following an intentional and substantial modification to a high-risk
artificial intelligence system on or after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026,
must include a statement disclosing the extent to which the high-risk
artificial intelligence system was used in a manner that was consistent with,
or varied from, the developer's intended uses of the high-risk artificial
intelligence system.
(g) On or before February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, and at least
annually thereafter, a deployer, or a third party contracted by the deployer,
must review the deployment of each high-risk artificial intelligence system
deployed by the deployer to ensure that the high-risk artificial intelligence
system is not causing algorithmic discrimination.
(4) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, and no later
than the time that a deployer deploys a high-risk artificial intelligence
system to make, or be a substantial factor in making, a consequential
decision concerning a consumer, the deployer shall:
(b) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, a deployer that has
deployed a high-risk artificial intelligence system to make, or be a
substantial factor in making, a consequential decision concerning a
consumer shall, if the consequential decision is adverse to the consumer,
provide to the consumer:
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 25B-004

(5) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, and except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, a deployer shall make available,
in a manner that is clear and readily available on the deployer's website, a
statement summarizing:
(7) If a deployer deploys a high-risk artificial intelligence system on
or after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, and subsequently discovers that the
high-risk artificial intelligence system has caused algorithmic
discrimination, the deployer, without unreasonable delay, but no later than
ninety days after the date of the discovery, shall send to the attorney
general, in a form and manner prescribed by the attorney general, a notice
disclosing the discovery.
(9) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, the attorney
general may require that a deployer, or a third party contracted by the
deployer, disclose to the attorney general, no later than ninety days after the
request and in a form and manner prescribed by the attorney general, the
risk management policy implemented pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the impact assessment completed pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, or the records maintained pursuant to subsection (3)(f) of this
section. The attorney general may evaluate the risk management policy,
impact assessment, or records to ensure compliance with this part 17, and
the risk management policy, impact assessment, and records are not subject
to disclosure under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72
of title 24. In a disclosure MADE pursuant to this subsection (9), a deployer
may designate the statement or documentation as including proprietary
information or a trade secret. To the extent that any information contained
in the risk management policy, impact assessment, or records includes
information subject to attorney-client privilege or work-product protection,
the disclosure does not constitute a waiver of the privilege or protection.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1704, amend (1)
as follows:
6-1-1704. Disclosure of an artificial intelligence system to
consumer. (1) On and after February 1, 2026 JUNE 30, 2026, and except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a deployer or other developer that
deploys, offers, sells, leases, licenses, gives, or otherwise makes available
an artificial intelligence system that is intended to interact with consumers
shall ensure the disclosure to each consumer who interacts with the artificial
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 25B-004

intelligence system that the consumer is interacting with an artificial
intelligence system.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 25B-004

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official
declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Connor Randall
SECRETARY OF ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 25B-004